Utah statutes.
31A-9-206.   Powers under organization permit and deposit of proceeds of subscriptions.

Subsection 31A-5-207(2) and Section 31A-5-208 apply to fraternals, except that:

(1)  the word "mutual" shall be read "fraternal"; and

(2)  there are no qualifying insurance policies as referred to in Subsection 31A-5-207(2) (a).



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

